test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ehitellemae52_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ehite(l)lemä: # Verb (52) ehite(l)lemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ehitellemä+V+Inf/mA: [ehitellemä, ehitelemä]
     ehitellemä+V+Inf: ehitelläq
     ehitellemä+V+Act+PrfPrc: ehitelnüq
     ehitellemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [ehiteld, ehiteldü]

     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [ehitele, ehitelle]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [ehitelet, ehiteledeq, ehitellet, ehitelledeq]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [ehiteles, ehitelles]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [ehitelemiq, ehitellemiq]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [ehiteletiq, ehitelletiq]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [ehiteleseq, ehitelleseq]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: [ehitele, ehitelle]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [ehiteli, ehitelli]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [ehitelit, ehiteliq, ehitelideq, ehitellit, ehitelliq, ehitellideq]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [ehiteli, ehitelli]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ehitelimiq, ehitellimiq]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ehitelitiq, ehitellitiq]
     ehitellemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ehiteliq, ehiteliväq, ehitelliq, ehitelliväq]

     ehitellemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ehiteldä
     ehitellemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ehiteldäs

     ehitellemä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [ehitelev, ehitellev]

     ehitellemä+V+Jus: ehitelguq
